Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2020.01
Imposition of lien for nonpayment of rates and charges; vote required.

(1) For purposes of this section, elected official means a mayor or a member of a city council, village board of trustees, or county board.

(2) Beginning August 1, 2008, only elected officials who are members or alternate members of the governing body of a joint entity or joint public agency created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act that provides services under the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act are authorized to vote on whether a lien should be imposed on real property for nonpayment of rates and charges under subsection (4) of section 13-2020. Notwithstanding any other requirements for action by the governing body, a vote in favor of imposing such a lien by a majority of the members eligible to vote on whether a lien should be imposed is required to impose such a lien.

Laws 2008, LB202, § 2.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.